Illinois, session 104th, HB3097.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 522-87 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-87)7    Sec. 22-87. Graduation requirements; Free Application for 8Federal Student Aid. 9    (a) Beginning with the 2020-2021 school year, in addition 10to any other requirements under this Code, as a prerequisite 11to receiving a high school diploma from a public high school, 12the parent or guardian of each student or, if a student is at 13least 18 years of age or legally emancipated, the student must 14comply with either of the following:15        (1) File a Free Application for Federal Student Aid 16    with the United States Department of Education or, if 17    applicable, an application for State financial aid.18        (2) On a form created by the State Board of Education, 19    file a waiver with the student's school district 20    indicating that the parent or guardian or, if applicable, 21    the student understands what the Free Application for 22    Federal Student Aid and application for State financial 23    aid are and has chosen not to file an application under   HB3097 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10902 LNS 20984 b1    paragraph (1).2    (b) Each school district with a high school must require 3each high school student to comply with this Section and must 4provide to each high school student and, if applicable, his or 5her parent or guardian any support or assistance necessary to 6comply with this Section. 7    Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the school 8district shall provide appropriate support to each high school 9student to assist with education about and the completion of a 10financial aid application as described in subsection (a). This 11support may be offered in a variety of formats, times, and 12settings and shall include an opportunity for the student to 13request and receive help during the school day in completing 14the student's portion of the financial aid application. The 15high school may request assistance from the Illinois Student 16Assistance Commission to support the completion of financial 17aid applications, including application completion events and 18individual assistance, at no cost to the high school.19    A high school student may choose whether to use the 20support or assistance provided under this Section. 21    A school district must award a high school diploma to a 22student who is unable to meet the requirements of subsection 23(a) due to extenuating circumstances, as determined by the 24school district, if (i) the student has met all other 25graduation requirements under this Code and (ii) the principal 26attests that the school district has made a good faith effort   HB3097 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10902 LNS 20984 b1to assist the student or, if applicable, his or her parent or 2guardian in filing an application or a waiver under subsection 3(a).4    (c) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to 5implement this Section.6(Source: P.A. 101-180, eff. 6-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.